Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3432
Violations; penalties.

(1) It shall be a Class II felony for a person to willfully sign or alter without authority or to otherwise alter, forge, conceal, or destroy a power of attorney for health care or to willfully conceal or destroy a revocation with the intent and effect of causing a withholding or withdrawing of life-sustaining procedures or artificially administered nutrition or hydration which hastens the death of the principal.

(2) It shall be a Class I misdemeanor for a person without the authorization of the principal to willfully alter, forge, conceal, or destroy a power of attorney for health care or a revocation of a power of attorney for health care.

(3) A physician or other health care provider who willfully prevents the transfer of a principal in accordance with section 30-3428 with the intention of avoiding the provisions of sections 30-3401 to 30-3432 shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 30;

Laws 1993, LB 782, § 30.